Maine, session 132, LD791.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 22 MRSA §3174-PPP is enacted to read:
§3174-PPP. Reimbursement for hospitals other than critical access hospitals for days
awaiting placement
Beginning January 1, 2026, the department shall provide reimbursement to hospitals,
other than critical access hospitals, for each day that a MaineCare eligible individual under
19 years of age is in the care of a hospital while awaiting placement in a children's
residential care facility as defined in section 8101, subsection 4. The department shall
reimburse hospitals prospectively at the average daily rate for a MaineCare member at a
children's residential care facility. For the purposes of this section, "critical access hospital"
has the same meaning as in section 7932, subsection 10.
Sec. 2. 34-B MRSA §15003, sub-§9-A is enacted to read:
9-A. Monthly data report. Beginning November 1, 2025, the department shall
submit a monthly report to the joint standing committee of the Legislature having
jurisdiction over health and human services matters with the total number of children in a
hospital emergency room who stayed in that hospital emergency room longer than 48 hours
after they no longer needed a hospital level of care. The report must also provide the
following data breakdown for the children in the report:
A. The number of children under 12 years of age;
B. The number of children who have entered the hospital emergency room directly
from a residential setting, including, but not limited to, a children's home as defined in
Title 22, section 8101, subsection 1, a children's residential care facility as defined in
Title 22, section 8101, subsection 4 or another hospital;
C. The number of children who are experiencing homelessness; and
D. The services needed that are unavailable, causing the children to remain in the
hospital emergency room.
Sec. 3. Hospital reimbursement rules. The Department of Health and Human
Services shall amend its rules in Chapter 101: MaineCare Benefits Manual, Chapter III,
Section 45, Hospital Services to implement the Maine Revised Statutes, Title 22, section
3174-PPP. Rules adopted pursuant to this section are routine technical rules as defined in
Title 5, chapter 375, subchapter 2-A.
Page 1 - 132LR0897(01)

Sec. 4. Crisis centers. No later than 270 days after adjournment of the First Regular
Session of the 132nd Legislature or March 16, 2026, whichever is later, the Department of
Health and Human Services shall issue a request for proposals to develop 3 crisis centers
in the State to meet the needs of children and adolescents with high levels of behavioral
health needs who are located in a hospital awaiting placement in an appropriate residential
facility or community service. At least 1/3 of the beds must be available for use by children
with intellectual disabilities or autism spectrum disorder. The request for proposals must
include capital costs with a goal to adapt existing facilities in the State. If no vendor has
responded to the request for proposals by October 1, 2026, the department is authorized to
issue a sole-source contract. If the department fails to enter into an agreement with a vendor
to develop one or more crisis centers by December 1, 2026, the department shall submit a
report to the joint standing committee of the Legislature having jurisdiction over health and
human services matters by March 1, 2027 with a plan for how the department will meet the
crisis needs of children and adolescents with high levels of behavioral health needs.
Sec. 5. Psychiatric residential treatment facilities. The Department of Health
and Human Services shall enter into an agreement with a vendor to provide one or more
psychiatric residential treatment facilities no later than April 1, 2025. If the department
fails to enter into an agreement with a vendor by that date, the department is required to
establish a facility that is owned and operated by the department and the facility must be
operational by July 1, 2026. The department shall submit a report no later than May 1,
2025 to the Joint Standing Committee on Health and Human Services with its actions and
plans with respect to establishing a psychiatric residential treatment facility either through
a vendor or department operation.
Sec. 6. Settlement data. The Department of Health and Human Services shall
provide to the joint standing committee of the Legislature having jurisdiction over health
and human services matters copies of the de-identified data provided to the independent
reviewer pursuant to the settlement agreement executed in response to the lawsuit United
States of America v. State of Maine, United States District Court, District of Maine, Docket
No. 1:24-cv-00315-SDN no later than 30 days after that data is provided to the independent
reviewer.
Emergency clause. In view of the emergency cited in the preamble, this legislation
takes effect when approved.